Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF99.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1844YH (4) 91 ss/ns H.F. 99 Section 1. Section 48A.10A, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. The state registrar shall compare lists of persons who 3 are registered to vote with the department of transportationâs 4 driverâs license and nonoperatorâs identification card files 5 and shall, on an initial basis, issue a voter identification 6 card to each active, registered voter whose name does not 7 appear in the department of transportationâs files. The voter 8 identification card shall include the name of the registered 9 voter, a signature line above which the registered voter shall 10 sign the voter identification card, the registered voterâs 11 identification number assigned to the voter pursuant to 12 section 47.7, subsection 2 , an additional four-digit personal 13 identification number assigned by the state commissioner, an 14 indication of whether the voter is a citizen of the United 15 States, and the times during which polling places will be open 16 on election days. 17 Sec. 2. Section 49.78, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 18 by adding the following new paragraph: 19 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. If the form of identification presented 20 by a voter does not indicate whether the voter is a citizen 21 of the United States, the voter shall present additional 22 documentation sufficient to show that the voter is a citizen of 23 the United States. The state commissioner shall adopt rules 24 for the implementation of this paragraph. 25 Sec. 3. Section 49.78, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 2025, 26 is amended to read as follows: 27 b. Other forms of identification sufficient to establish 28 identity and residence under section 48A.7A, subsection 1 , 29 paragraph âbâ , if the form of identification indicates that the 30 voter is a citizen of the United States . 31 Sec. 4. Section 321.182, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 32 2025, is amended to read as follows: 33 a. Make application on a form provided by the department 34 which shall include the applicantâs full name, signature, 35 -1- LSB 1844YH (4) 91 ss/ns 1/ 3 H.F. 99 current mailing address, current residential address, date 1 of birth, social security number, and physical description 2 including sex, height, and eye color. The application shall 3 also require the applicant to indicate whether the applicant 4 is a citizen of the United States and, if so, to submit proof 5 of citizenship. The application may contain other information 6 the department may require by rule. Pursuant to procedures 7 established by the department and for an applicant who is 8 a foreign national temporarily present in this state, the 9 department may waive the requirement that the application 10 include the applicantâs social security number. 11 Sec. 5. Section 321.189, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 12 2025, is amended to read as follows: 13 a. Appearing on the driverâs license shall be a 14 distinguishing number assigned to the licensee; the licenseeâs 15 full name, date of birth, sex, and residence address; a 16 color photograph; a physical description of the licensee; 17 an indication of whether the licensee is a citizen of the 18 United States; the name of the state; the dates of issuance 19 and expiration; and the usual signature of the licensee. The 20 license shall identify the class of vehicle the licensee may 21 operate and the applicable endorsements and restrictions which 22 the department shall require by rule. 23 Sec. 6. Section 321.190, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 24 2025, is amended to read as follows: 25 a. The department shall, upon application and payment 26 of the required fee, issue to an applicant a nonoperatorâs 27 identification card. To be valid the card shall bear a 28 distinguishing number other than a social security number 29 assigned to the cardholder, the full name, date of birth, 30 sex, residence address, a physical description and a color 31 photograph of the cardholder, an indication of whether the 32 cardholder is a citizen of the United States, the usual 33 signature of the cardholder, and such other information 34 as the department may require by rule. An applicant for a 35 -2- LSB 1844YH (4) 91 ss/ns 2/ 3 H.F. 99 nonoperatorâs identification card shall apply for the card in 1 the manner provided in section 321.182, subsections 1 through 2 3 . The card shall be issued to the applicant at the time 3 of application pursuant to procedures established by rule. 4 An applicant for a nonoperatorâs identification card who is 5 required by 50 U.S.C. app. Â§451 et seq. to register with the 6 United States selective service system shall be registered by 7 the department with the selective service system as provided 8 in section 321.183 . 9 Sec. 7. APPLICABILITY. The following apply to voter 10 identification cards, driverâs licenses, and nonoperatorâs 11 identification cards applied for, issued, or renewed on or 12 after the effective date of this Act: 13 1. The section of this Act amending section 48A.10A. 14 2. The section of this Act amending section 321.182. 15 3. The section of this Act amending section 321.189. 16 4. The section of this Act amending section 321.190. 17